New York, session 2025-2026, A1662.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (c) of section 605 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 196 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 (c) 1. The report required by this section shall be made in such form 5 and number as the commissioner may prescribe. Such report shall include 6 information on the width and length of trucks, tractors, trailers and 7 semitrailers, which are in excess of ninety-five inches in width or 8 thirty-four feet in length and which are involved in such accidents, 9 whether such accident took place in a work area and whether it was being 10 operated with an overweight or over dimension permit. Such report shall 11 distinctly indicate and include information as to whether the inflatable 12 restraint system inflated and deployed. Such report shall include infor- 13 mation on the type or types of vehicles involved, including passenger 14 motor vehicles, commercial motor vehicles, motorcycles, limited use 15 motorcycles, off-highway motorcycles, electric scooters, bicycles with 16 electric assist, and/or bicycles. 17 2. The report required by this section shall include contact informa- 18 tion, including name, address, telephone number, and email address, if 19 available, for a commercial enterprise where a vehicle or bicycle is 20 operated by an employee or independent contractor of such commercial 21 enterprise. Telephone numbers and email addresses, if available, for all 22 parties and witnesses shall be included. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 24 manner as chapter 196 of the laws of 2024, takes effect. Effective EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04432-01-5 A. 1662 2 1 immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regu- 2 lation necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective 3 date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective 4 date.